Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.230

Disposition of moneys collected—Treasurer's bond.

All money collected under the authority of this chapter shall be paid to the treasurer of the commission, and be deposited by him or her in banks designated by the commission, and disbursed on the order of the commission. The treasurer shall file with the commission a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in favor of the state and the commission, jointly and severally, in a sum to be fixed by the commission, but not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, and conditioned upon his or her faithful performance of his or her duties and his or her strict accounting of all funds of the commission. RCW 43.01.050 shall not apply to money collected under this chapter.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6035; 1969 c 129 s 23.]